North Carolina statutes. Chapter 153C. Uwharrie Regional Resources Act. [Repealed]
§§ 153C-1 through 153C-4.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 15.1A, effective July 1, 2013.

History.

S. 153C-1; 2010-176, s. 1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.1A, effective July 1, 2013. s. 153C-2; 2010-176, s. 1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.1A, effective July 1, 2013. s. 153C-3; 2010-176, s. 1; 2011-3, s. 2; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.1A, effective July 1, 2013. s. 153C-4; 2010-176, s. 1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.1A, effective July 1, 2013.

Editor’s Note.

Former

G.S. 153C-1

pertained to the short title, legislative findings, and purpose. Former G.S. 153C-2 pertained to definitions. Former G.S. 153C-3 pertained to the Uwharrie Regional Resources Commission. Former G.S. 153C-4 pertained to the Uwharrie Regional Resources Fund.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2013.’ ”

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 38.5, is a severability clause.